Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2585YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 720 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 28E.45 Joint taxing authorities. 1 1. For purposes of this section, âgovernmental unitâ means 2 a political subdivision of the state with the authority to 3 assess, levy, and collect taxes, including but not limited to a 4 county, a city, a school district, or a township. 5 2. Two or more governmental units located in this state may, 6 under a joint agreement in accordance with this chapter and in 7 the interest of cost savings and efficiency, combine portions 8 or all of their services and authority related to levying 9 taxes, collecting taxes, and assessing property values or other 10 applicable taxing methods. 11